test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-onni_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  foma:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.foma
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.foma
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - onni - ok : #
    Verb+Active+AgentSg1+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: konnis
    Verb+Active+AgentSg2+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: sonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentSg3Mal+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: ronnis
    Verb+Active+AgentSg3Fem+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: yakonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentSg3Mal+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: ronnis
    Verb+Active+AgentSg3Neuter+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: yonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentDu21+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: tenonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentDu31+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: yakenonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentDu2+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: senonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentDu3+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: nonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentDu3Fem+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: kenonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentPl2Sg1+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: tyonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentPl3Sg1+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: yakyonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentPl2+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: tsyonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentPl3+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: ronnonnis
    Verb+Active+AgentPl3Fem+PatSg3Neuter+onni+Habitual: konnonnis
